Nevada, session 83, AB338.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall apply to the Secretary of Health and
Human Services to amend its home and community-based services
waiver granted pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396n. The waiver must be
amended, in addition to providing coverage for any home and
community-based services which the waiver covers on January 1,
2026, to authorize the Department to include as medical assistance
under Medicaid the funding of attendant care services for frail
elderly persons, including, without limitation:
(a) Bathing;
(b) Grooming;
(c) Toileting;
(d) Moving about;
(e) Dressing; and
(f) Eating.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Cooperate with the Federal Government in amending the
waiver pursuant to this section;
(b) If the Federal Government approves the amendment to the
waiver, adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of
this section, including, without limitation, regulations establishing
the criteria to be used in determining eligibility for a person to
receive attendant care services pursuant to subsection 1; and
(c) Implement the amendments to the waiver only to the extent
that the amendments are approved by the Federal Government.
3. As used in this section, “frail elderly person” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 427A.029.
Sec. 2. Chapter 427A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Division shall collaborate with the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health of the Department to establish an Internet
website to facilitate connection between agencies to provide
personal care services in the home and persons in need of
personal care services.
2. The Internet website established pursuant to subsection 1
must:
-
*AB338*

– 3 –
(a) Include an entry for each agency to provide personal care
services in the home that is licensed in this State. Each such entry
must include, without limitation:
(1) The location and contact information of the agency;
(2) The locations where the agency provides services;
(3) The services and level of care provided by the agency;
(4) Any disciplinary action that has ever been imposed
against the agency; and
(5) The types of insurance accepted by the agency.
(b) Provide a means by which an agency to provide personal
care services in the home that wishes to participate may connect
with persons who may be interested in obtaining the services of the
agency.
3. As used in this section, “agency to provide personal care
services in the home” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0021.
Sec. 3. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
-
*AB338*

– 4 –
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB338*